Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.381

"University tract" defined.

For the purposes of this chapter, "university tract" means the tract of land in the city of Seattle, consisting of approximately ten acres, originally known as the "old university grounds," and more recently referred to as the "metropolitan tract," together with all buildings, improvements, facilities, and appurtenances thereon.

[ 1999 c 346 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Construction—1999 c 346: "The purpose of this act is to consolidate the statutes authorizing the board of regents of the University of Washington to control the property of the university. Nothing in this act may be construed to diminish in any way the powers of the board of regents to control its property including, but not limited to, the powers now or previously set forth in RCW * 28B.20.392 through 28B.20.398." [ 1999 c 346 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: RCW 28B.20.392 was repealed by 1999 c 346 s 8.

Effective date—1999 c 346: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 17, 1999]." [ 1999 c 346 s 9.]